Washington statutes.
RCW 19.215.030

Compliance with federal regulations.

Any bank, financial institution, health care organization, or other entity that is subject to the federal regulations under the interagency guidelines establishing standards for safeguarding customer information (12 C.F.R. 208 Appendix D-2, 12 C.F.R. 364 Appendix B, 12 C.F.R. 30 Appendix B, 12 C.F.R. 570 Appendix B); the guidelines for safeguarding member information (12 C.F.R. 748 Appendix A); and the standards for privacy of individually identifiable health information (45 C.F.R. 160 and 164), and which is in compliance with these federal guidelines, is in compliance with the requirements of this chapter.

[ 2002 c 90 s 4.]